Hawaii, session 2026, GM1207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 139-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) No person [may] shall be appointed or employed as a
law enforcement officer after June 30, [2026>] 2028, unless the
person:
(1) Has satisfactorily completed a basic program of law
enforcement training approved by the board;
(2) Has received training designed to minimize the use of
excessive force, including legal standards,
de-escalation techniques, crisis intervention tactics,
mental health response, implicit bias, and first aid;
and
(3) Possesses other qualifications as prescribed by the
board for the employment of law enforcement officers,
including minimum age, education, physical and mental
standards, citizenship, good conduct, moral character,
and experience.
2026-2463 SB2519 GDI SMA.docx
l■llnll■lllillnllllllllll

Page 2
S.B. NO. --
(b) Beginning on July 1, [2026,] 2028, the board shall
issue a certification to an applicant or law enforcement officer
who meets the requirements of subsection (a) or who has
satisfactorily completed a program or course of instruction in
another jurisdiction that the board deems to be equivalent in
content and quality to the requirements of subsection (a)."
SECTION 2. Section 139-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) No person shall be appointed or employed as a law
enforcement officer by any county police department, the
department of law enforcement, the department of land and
natural resources, the department of taxation, or the department
of the attorney general after June 30, [2026,] 2028, unless the
person possesses a valid certification issued by the board
pursuant to section 139-6(b)."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2463 SB2519 CDl SMA.docx 2
ffliwwiiiiiiiiiiiiimiiiiuii

2519
S.B. NO
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026

S.B.No. 2519, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of HawaiT, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
39-26

SB No. 2519, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives